Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-361
Drainage district warrants; form.

All warrants issued by the board of supervisors of any drainage district shall be in the following form:

$ ............

No. ..........

Treasurer of the County of ............

Pay to ............. dollars out of any money in the treasury belonging to .......... Drainage District in the County of .......... . Given at the town of .........., State of Nebraska, by order of the board of supervisors of ............... Drainage District.

Attest:

Secretary ...............

Chairman ................

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 29, p. 632;

R.S.1913, § 1856;

C.S.1922, § 1803;

C.S.1929, § 31-460;

R.S.1943, § 31-361.